California statutes. Education Code
(b) Mechanical condition of a schoolbus during operation by the transit system is maintained so as to meet or exceed those regulations adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to Section 39831 governing the operation of schoolbuses.

(c) Accurate records are maintained that reflect the actual number of miles any schoolbus is driven during times of operation by the transit system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39842.

(a) Any person who enters a schoolbus or school pupil activity bus without prior authorization of the driver or other school official with intent to commit any crime and who refuses to disembark after being ordered to do so by the driver or other school official is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both.

(b) A school district or county superintendent of schools may place a notice at the entrance of a schoolbus or school pupil activity bus that complies with the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 1256.5 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations and that warns against unauthorized entry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39843.

(a) The county superintendent of schools, the superintendent of a school district, a charter school, or the owner or operator of a private school that provides transportation to or from a school or school activity shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles, in a form and manner that the Department of Motor Vehicles specifies, within five calendar days
 after the county office of education, the governing board of a school district, the charter school, the owner or operator of the private school, or, in situations where the transportation services are contracted out, the driver’s employer, has done both of the following:

(1) Ordered and upheld disciplinary action, after completion of disciplinary procedures conducted in compliance with rights granted by law or a collective bargaining agreement, against a driver of a schoolbus,
 school pupil activity bus, or youth bus who was found to have left the immediate vicinity of the vehicle to which the driver had been assigned with an unsupervised pupil onboard.

(2) Made a finding that the driver’s actions constituted
 gross negligence.

(b) For purposes of this section, escorting pupils pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 22112 of the Vehicle Code shall not be considered leaving the immediate vicinity of the vehicle.

(c) For purposes of this section, “gross negligence” means the want of even scant care or an extreme departure from the ordinary standard of conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 721, Sec. 3.   (SB 1072)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Special Services [39860. - 39860.]

39860.

(a) The governing board of a school district may contract for the transportation of pupils attending schools within the district to and from any exposition or fair, school activities, or other activities that the governing board of the school district determines to be for the benefit of the pupils, in this state, and may pay for the transportation out of any funds of the school district available for the purpose.

(b) The governing board of a school district shall require that any contract for the transportation of pupils under this section shall include the requirement that a pupil shall not be left unattended on a schoolbus, school pupil activity
 bus, or youth bus in accordance with paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 39831.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 721, Sec. 4.   (SB 1072)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Compensated Driver Requirements [39875. - 39882.]

39875.

(a) Except as provided pursuant to subdivisions (b) to (g), inclusive, this article shall apply to all drivers employed by
 a local educational agency, contracted
 by a local educational agency, or contracted by any entity with funding from a local educational agency, providing school-related pupil transportation for compensation.

(b) Nothing in this article shall be construed to apply to a driver employed by any of the following:

(1) A municipally owned transit system offering supplementary service.

(2) A congregate care facility licensed by the State Department of Social Services.

(3) A county
 human services agency.

(4) An entity, excluding entities with a primary purpose of providing transportation services, serving pupils experiencing homelessness that is coordinated with the homeless continuum of care in counties that have one or otherwise designated to serve children who are homeless by a county without a continuum of care.

(5) A county probation agency.

(6) Another government agency, other than a local educational
 agency.

(7) A foster family agency, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(8) A tribal authority.

(c) Nothing in this article shall be construed to apply to any of the following persons who are compensated to drive a pupil:

(1) A parent or relative
 as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 361.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or a nonrelative extended family member as defined in Section 362.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) A guardian.

(3) A caregiver given temporary or permanent custody of the
 pupil by a court, child welfare agency, tribal authority, or county probation department.

(4) A court-appointed educational rights holder.

(5) A court-appointed special advocate.

(6) A pupil who drives themself.

(d) If both of the following occur, nothing in this article shall be construed to apply to a school employee of a local educational agency when the employee provides transportation to pupils due to or because of the employee’s supervision of pupils for a field trip, extracurricular activity, or athletic program, or when the employee provides
 transportation to pupils for other activities, not to exceed 40 hours of drive time per school year per employee:

(1) A local educational agency makes a reasonable effort to secure a driver who meets the requirements of this article.

(2) When a local educational agency is unable to secure a driver who meets the requirements of this article, the local educational agency informs the parent, guardian, or court-appointed educational rights holder of the pupil being transported that the driver transporting their pupil does not meet the requirements of this article, unless that notice will jeopardize a pupil’s privacy rights.

(e) Nothing in this article shall be construed to apply to a driver who transports a pupil who must be immediately transported to a facility in the case of a medical or psychiatric emergency, or in the case of pupils who need to be transported immediately as the result of an emergency that arises as a result of a fire, flood, earthquake, or epidemic, or because of any order of any military officer of the United States or of the state to meet an emergency created by war, or because of an immediate threat to the physical safety of the pupil or pupils. The exemption pursuant to this subdivision involving an epidemic shall only apply to each epidemic for a period lasting no longer than one month.

(f) Nothing in this article shall be construed to apply to a driver who transports a
 pupil if the transportation is being provided through a Foster Youth Services Coordinating Program while a pupil’s transportation plan is being finalized. The exemption pursuant to this subdivision shall apply for a period lasting no longer than one month after the first ride is provided to that pupil under this exemption.

(g) Nothing in this article shall be construed to apply to a driver during a trip for which they are authorized by the local educational agency to transport one or more pupils for a field trip when the destination is more than 200 miles from the transported pupil’s California school campus.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 380, Sec. 2.   (SB 88)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative on July 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 39882.)
-------------------------------------------

39877.

(a) A driver who provides transportation services for pupils in a vehicle with a maximum capacity of 10 or fewer persons, including the driver, shall:

(1) Hold a valid California driver’s license for the appropriate class of vehicle.

(2) Be at least 18 years of age.

(3) Pass a criminal background check, including fingerprint clearance consistent with Section 45125 for employees and Section 45125.1 for all other compensated drivers.

(4) Have a satisfactory driving record that includes
 none of the
 following:

(A) Within three years, has committed any violation that results in a conviction assigned a violation point count of two or more, as defined in Sections 12810 and 12810.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(B) Within three years, has had their driving privilege suspended, revoked, or on probation for any reason involving the unsafe operation of a motor vehicle.

(C) Has been determined by the Department of Motor Vehicles to be a negligent or incompetent operator.

(5) Not have demonstrated irrational behavior to the extent that a reasonable and prudent person would have reasonable cause to believe that the driver’s ability to perform the duties of a
 driver may be impaired.

(6) Not have been convicted of an offense listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 13370 of the Vehicle Code, paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 13370 of the Vehicle Code, or subdivision (b) of Section 13370 of the Vehicle Code.

(7) Provide their employer or the private entity contracting with the local educational agency a report showing the driver’s current public record as recorded by the Department of Motor Vehicles and participate in the Department of Motor Vehicles’ pull-notice system.

(8) Be subjected to and comply with drug and alcohol testing
 consistent with Section 34520.3 of the Vehicle Code, subject to the cannabis discrimination limitations described in Section 12954 of the Government Code.

(9) (A) Complete a medical examination not more than two years prior to the driver performing pupil transportation by a physician licensed to practice medicine, a licensed advanced practice registered nurse qualified to perform a medical examination, a licensed physician assistant, or a licensed doctor of chiropractic listed on the most current National Registry of Certified Medical Examiners, as adopted by the United States Department of Transportation. The driver shall provide a copy of the Medical Examiner’s Certificate, Form MCSA-5876, or the medical examiner’s certificate of clearance to their employer or the private entity contracting with the
 local educational agency. Neither the driver nor the medical examiner need to submit this examination result to the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(B) The driver shall complete a medical examination pursuant to this paragraph every two years after the initial examination and provide a copy of the Medical Examiner’s Certificate, Form MCSA-5876, or the medical examiner’s certificate of clearance to their employer or the private entity contracting with the local educational agency.

(C) Within the same month of reaching 65 years of age and each 12th month thereafter, the driver shall undergo a medical examination pursuant to this paragraph and provide a copy of the Medical Examiner’s Certificate, Form
 MCSA-5876, or the medical examiner’s certificate of clearance to their employer or the private entity contracting with the local educational agency.

(10) Submit and clear a tuberculosis risk assessment consistent with Section 49406.

(11) Not drive for more than 10 hours within a work period, or after the end of the 16th hour after coming on duty following eight consecutive hours off duty.

(12) Complete initial training and
 subsequent required training sufficient to gain proficiency in all of the following:

(A) Pretrip vehicle inspections.

(B) Safe loading and unloading of passengers.

(C) Proper use of seatbelts and child safety restraints.

(D) Handling accidents, incidents, and emergency situations.

(E) Providing proper accommodations for pupils with disabilities.

(F) Defensive driving.

(G) Operations in inclement weather.

(H) Operations at night or under impaired visibility conditions.

(13) Maintain a daily log sheet and complete the daily pretrip inspection of the vehicle being driven that day, which shall include all of the following:

(A) A check of the operability of all lights, initialed by the driver before the vehicle is first driven in service that day.

(B) A check for fluid leaks, initialed by the driver before the vehicle is first driven in service that day.

(C) A check for the operability of the brakes, initialed by the driver before the vehicle is driven in service that day.

(14) Complete training at
 least equivalent to the American Red Cross first aid training program, or hold a valid and current first aid certificate issued by the American Red Cross or by an organization whose first aid training program is at least equivalent to the American Red Cross’ first aid training program, as determined by the Emergency Medical Services Authority.

(b) For vehicles with a maximum capacity of eight or fewer passengers, excluding the driver, only street-legal coupes, sedans, or light-duty vehicles, including vans, minivans, sport utility vehicles, and pickup trucks, shall be used for pupil transportation.

(c) Nothing in this article shall limit any additional safety or training requirements that may be imposed by the Public Utilities Commission, a local educational agency, or any government
 agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 380, Sec. 2.   (SB 88)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative on July 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 39882.)
-------------------------------------------

39878.

A driver who provides transportation services for pupils in a vehicle with a capacity of more than 10 persons, including the driver, shall:

(a) Hold a valid California commercial driver’s license for the appropriate class of vehicle, endorsed for passenger transportation pursuant to Section 15278 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) Comply with paragraphs (2) to (14), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 39877 if they are not already required to by law.

(c) This article shall not reduce other legal requirements placed on any driver who provides transportation services for
 pupils in a vehicle with a capacity of more than 10 persons, including, but not limited to, a driver of a schoolbus or school pupil activity bus.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 380, Sec. 2.   (SB 88)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative on July 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 39882.)
-------------------------------------------

39879.

(a) Any local educational agency contracting with a private entity to provide pupil transportation shall obtain from the private entity a written attestation to all of the following:

(1) That it not have any applicable law violations at the time of applying for the contract.

(2) That it will maintain compliance with applicable laws for the duration of the contract.

(3) That only drivers who meet the requirements of paragraphs (1) to (14), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 39877 work, or will work, under the contract between the private entity and
 local educational agency.

(4) That it has on file all the reports and documents required pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (14), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 39877 for the duration of the contract, including, but not limited to, updated, revised, or modified reports and documents. These reports and documents shall be available for inspection by the local educational agency or any other state regulatory agency at any time.

(b) A third party may report to the relevant local educational agency that the private entity the local educational agency contracted with has failed to provide a truthful attestation as required under subdivision (a) or has failed to maintain compliance with the applicable laws required for the duration of the contract. The third party shall provide
 documentation to substantiate their allegation before the local educational agency considers it.

(c) Any vehicle used to provide pupil transportation for compensation by a local educational agency shall meet both of the following:

(1) Be inspected every 12 months, or every 50,000 miles, whichever comes first, at a facility licensed by the Bureau of Automotive Repair to ensure that the vehicle passes a 19-point vehicle inspection, as adopted by the Public Utilities Commission and set forth in D.13-09-045, before allowing the vehicle to be driven. This requirement does not apply to vehicles owned or contracted with a local educational agency already subject to a statutory inspection program.

(2) Be equipped with a
 first aid kit and a fire extinguisher.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 380, Sec. 2.   (SB 88)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative on July 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 39882.)
-------------------------------------------

39880.

(a) To the extent that the requirements of this article conflict with a contract entered into between a local educational agency and a private entity before January 1, 2024, this article shall not apply until the expiration or renewal of that contract.

(b) As used in this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, entity providing services under a school transportation joint powers agreement, or regional occupational center or program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 380, Sec. 2.   (SB 88)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

39881.

As used in this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Applicable law” means applicable California laws within the Labor and Workforce Development Agency’s jurisdiction related to the misclassification of employees as independent contractors, including the failure to pay wages, imposing unlawful expenses on employees, failure to provide workers’ compensation insurance, and failure to remit payroll taxes as required under the Unemployment Insurance Code as well as laws protecting worker health and safety.

(b) “Applicable law violation” means a violation that has a final determination, order, judgment, or award
 issued against a private entity for engaging in illegal conduct related to applicable laws and that remains unabated or unsatisfied following the period during which an appeal may be made.

(c) “Congregate care facility” means a community care facility, intermediate care facility, skilled nursing facility, or a short-term residential therapeutic program.

(d) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, entity providing services under a school transportation joint powers agreement, or regional occupational center or program.

(e) “School-related
 pupil transportation” means home-to-school transportation, field trips, after school program-related transportation, preschool and childcare-related transportation, athletic program-related transportation, extracurricular school activity-related transportation, or any transportation of pupils to or from a school campus.

(f) “Municipally owned transit system” means a transit system owned by a city, or by a district created pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 24501) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(g) “Supplementary service” means additional service provided by a municipally owned transit system for the purpose of
 ensuring the regular transit service is not impacted by large loads associated with pupil passengers traveling to or from schoolsites around school bell times.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 380, Sec. 2.   (SB 88)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative on July 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 39882.)
-------------------------------------------

39882.

(a) Except as provided pursuant to subdivision (b), this article shall become operative on July 1, 2025.

(b) Section 39880 shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 380, Sec. 2.   (SB 88)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Farm Labor Driver Training Course [40070. - 40070.]

40070.

(a) The State Department of Education shall develop or approve a course for the training of schoolbus, school pupil activity bus, and farm labor vehicle drivers that will provide them with the skills and knowledge necessary to prepare them for an examination for certification pursuant to Sections 12517 and 12519 of the Vehicle Code. The department shall seek the advice and assistance of the Department of Motor Vehicles and the Department of the California Highway Patrol in developing or approving the course.

(b) The department shall train or approve the necessary instructional personnel to conduct the course. For schoolbus and school pupil activity bus training, the department shall provide for and approve the course outline and lesson plans used in the course. For farm labor vehicle training, the department shall approve the course outline and lesson plans used in the course.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Specialized Vehicle Driver Training Courses [40080. - 40090.5.]

40080.

(a) This article governs the minimum training required for drivers to obtain or renew a certificate described in Section 12517, 12519, or 12804.6 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) As used in this article, “department” means the State Department of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

40081.

(a) The department shall develop or approve courses for training school pupil activity bus (SPAB), transit bus, schoolbus, and farm labor vehicle drivers that will provide them with the skills and knowledge necessary to prepare them for certification pursuant to Sections 12517, 12519, and 12804.6 of the Vehicle Code. The department shall seek the advice and assistance of the Department of Motor Vehicles and the Department of the California Highway Patrol in developing or approving those courses.

(b) The department shall train or approve the necessary instructional personnel to conduct the driver training courses. For all schoolbus and school pupil activity bus (SPAB) driver
 instructor training, the department shall provide for and approve the course outline and lesson plans used in the course. For transit bus and farm labor vehicle driver training, the department shall approve the course outline and lesson plans used in the course.

(c) All courses of study and training activities required by this article shall be approved by the department and given by, or in the presence of, an instructor in possession of a valid school pupil activity bus (SPAB), transit bus, schoolbus, or farm labor vehicle driver instructor certificate of the appropriate class.

(d) As an alternative to subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), instructors who have received a certificate from the Transportation Safety Institute of the United States Department of Transportation indicating that they have completed the Mass Transit Instructor Orientation and Training (Train-the-Trainer) course
 may approve courses of instruction and train transit bus drivers in order to meet the requirements for certification pursuant to Section 12804.6 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 347, Sec. 16.   (SB 942)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

40082.

(a) An original applicant for a certificate to drive a schoolbus, as defined by Section 545 of the Vehicle Code, shall have successfully completed a minimum 40-hour course of instruction. The course shall include at least 20 hours of classroom instruction in, but not limited to, all units of the Instructor’s Manual for California’s Bus Driver’s Training Course. All classroom instruction shall be given by, or in the presence of, a state-certified instructor of the appropriate class. The course shall also include at least 20 hours of applicant behind-the-wheel training in all sections of the Instructor’s Behind-the-Wheel Guide for California’s Bus Driver’s Training Course. Applicant behind-the-wheel training shall include driving vehicles comparable to those vehicles that will be driven by the applicant to transport pupils. All behind-the-wheel training shall be given by a state-certified instructor of the appropriate class or the delegated behind-the-wheel trainer as designated pursuant to Section 40084.5.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a driver who is holding a driver certificate or endorsement described in Section 40083, and is seeking a schoolbus certificate of the appropriate class, shall have successfully completed a minimum of five hours of classroom instruction, including, but not limited to, schoolbus laws and regulations, defensive driving, pupil loading and unloading, and the exceptional child. All classroom instruction shall be given by, or in the presence of, a state-certified instructor of the appropriate class. The driver shall also complete at least three hours of behind-the-wheel training in defensive driving practices, lane control, railroad grade crossing procedures, and pupil loading and unloading.

(c) A driver may not be certified to drive a schoolbus in the manner set forth in subdivision (b) if that driver was instructed by a person who received his or her certificate in the manner described in subdivision (d) of Section 40081.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

40083.

An original applicant for a certificate to drive any bus defined by Section 546 or 642 of the Vehicle Code shall have successfully completed a minimum 35-hour course of instruction. The course shall include at least 15 hours of classroom instruction, including, but not limited to, all units of the Instructor’s Manual for California’s Bus Driver’s Training Course, or other classroom curricula which the department has certified meets or exceeds the standards in its curricula. All classroom instruction shall be given by, or in the presence of, a state-certified instructor of the appropriate class, except that an instructor who has received a certificate as described in subdivision (d) of Section 40081, may provide the training for an original applicant for a certificate to drive a bus defined by Section 642 of the Vehicle Code. The course shall also include at least 20 hours of applicant behind-the-wheel training in all sections of the Instructor’s Behind-the-Wheel Guide for California’s Bus Driver’s Training Course, or at least 20 hours of other behind-the-wheel training or driving experience that the department has certified meets or exceeds the standards of its training course. Applicant behind-the-wheel training shall include driving vehicles comparable to those vehicles that will be used to transport passengers. All behind-the-wheel training for a certificate to drive a bus defined by Section 546 of the Vehicle Code shall be given by a state-certified instructor of the appropriate class or the delegated behind-the-wheel trainer as designated pursuant to Section 40084.5. All behind-the-wheel training for a certificate to drive a bus defined by Section 642 of the Vehicle Code shall be given by a state-certified instructor of the appropriate class or the delegated behind-the-wheel trainer as designated pursuant to Section 40084.5, or the delegated behind-the-wheel trainer as designated by the instructor certified pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 40081.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

40084.

An original applicant for a certificate to drive a farm labor vehicle shall have successfully completed a minimum 20-hour course of instruction. The course shall include at least 10 hours of classroom instruction, including, but not limited to, all units of the Instructor’s Manual for California’s Bus Driver’s Training Course. All classroom instruction shall be given by, or in the presence of, a state-certified instructor of the appropriate class. The course shall also include at least 10 hours of applicant behind-the-wheel training in all sections of the Instructor’s Behind-the-Wheel Guide for California’s Bus Driver’s Training Course. Applicant behind-the-wheel training shall include driving vehicles comparable to those that will be driven by the applicant to transport farm passengers. All behind-the-wheel training shall be given by a state-certified instructor of the appropriate class or the delegated behind-the-wheel trainer as designated pursuant to Section 40084.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

40084.5.

(a) All behind-the-wheel training required to obtain certificates pursuant to Sections 12517 and 12519 of the Vehicle Code shall be performed by a state-certified instructor or by a delegated behind-the-wheel trainer who has been certified or approved by the department to conduct the required training.

(b) A “delegated behind-the-wheel trainer” means a person selected to assist a state-certified instructor in the behind-the-wheel training of drivers. Selected persons shall be trained by state-certified instructors and approved by the department before conducting any behind-the-wheel training. The minimum standards for the selection of a delegated behind-the-wheel trainer are as follows:

(1) One year experience as a driver of the appropriate type and size vehicle immediately preceding the date of selection as a delegated behind-the-wheel trainer.

(2) Possession of the appropriate license, certificates, and endorsements needed to drive and train in a particular type and size vehicle.

(3) A high school diploma or General Education Development (GED) equivalent.

(4) A driving record without chargeable accidents within the past three years immediately preceding the date of selection.

(5) Successful completion of all training in the latest edition of the Instructor’s Behind-the-Wheel Training Guide for California’s Bus Driver’s Training Course given by, and in the presence of, a state-certified instructor of the appropriate class.

(6) Successful completion of a written assessment test on current laws, regulations, and policies given by, and in the presence of, a state-certified instructor of the appropriate class.

(7) Successful completion of a driving test and a behind-the-wheel training performance test on all phases of behind-the-wheel and vehicle inspection training. The test shall be given by, and in the presence of, a state-certified instructor of the appropriate class.

(c) The state-certified instructor shall train and document the qualifications and competence of each delegated behind-the-wheel trainer to be utilized in training. All training required by this section shall be documented on the State Department of Education Training Certificate T-01, and signed by a state-certified school pupil activity bus (SPAB), transit bus, schoolbus, or farm labor vehicle driver instructor of the appropriate class, and by the delegated behind-the-wheel trainer. The signatures shall certify that the instruction was given to, and received by, the delegated behind-the-wheel trainer and that the delegated behind-the-wheel trainer displayed a level of competency necessary to train drivers to drive authorized vehicles in a safe and competent manner. The completed State Department of Education Training Certificate T-01 shall be submitted to the department in Sacramento, along with all other required documents, when requesting approval of a delegated behind-the-wheel trainer.

(d) The department may disapprove the eligibility of a delegated behind-the-wheel trainer for any of the following causes:

(1) The state-certified instructor authorizing the competency of the delegated behind-the-wheel trainer has requested disapproval.

(2) The employer of the delegated behind-the-wheel trainer has requested disapproval.

(3) The delegated behind-the-wheel trainer has voluntarily requested disapproval.

(4) The delegated behind-the-wheel trainer failed to comply with Section 40087.

(5) The delegated behind-the-wheel trainer failed to comply with Section 40084.5.

(6) The delegated behind-the-wheel trainer does not possess a valid driver’s license, appropriate endorsements, or special driver’s certificate of the appropriate class.

(7) The delegated behind-the-wheel trainer’s driver’s license or special driver’s certificate has been suspended or revoked.

(e) A delegated behind-the-wheel trainer may be limited in behind-the-wheel training as determined by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

40085.

Applicants seeking to renew a certificate to drive a schoolbus as defined in Section 545 of the Vehicle Code or a school pupil activity bus as defined in Section 546 of the Vehicle Code shall have successfully completed at least 10 hours of original or renewal classroom instruction, or behind-the-wheel or in-service training, during each 12 months of certificate validity. In-service training credit may be given by a state-certified driver instructor of the appropriate class to an applicant for attending or participating in appropriate driver training workshops, driver safety meetings, driver safety conferences, and other activities directly related to passenger safety and driver training. During the last 12 months of the
 special driver certificate validity, the 10 hours required shall consist of classroom instruction covering, but not limited to, current laws and regulations, defensive driving, accident prevention, emergency procedures, passenger loading and unloading, and the inspection procedures pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 39831.3. Failure to successfully complete the required training during any 12-month period of certificate validity is cause for the Department of Motor Vehicles to cancel the bus driver certificate. All training required by Section 40089 may be accepted in lieu of the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 721, Sec. 5.   (SB 1072)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

40085.5.

Applicants seeking to renew a certificate to drive a transit bus as defined in Section 642 of the Vehicle Code shall have successfully completed at least eight hours of original or renewal classroom instruction, or behind-the-wheel or in-service training during each 12 months of certificate validity. In-service training credit may be given by a state-certified driver instructor of the appropriate class, or an instructor certified pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 40081, to an applicant for attending or participating in appropriate driver training workshops, driver safety meetings, driver safety conferences, and other activities directly related to passenger safety and driver training. During the last 12 months of the validity of the certificate, the eight hours required shall consist of classroom instruction covering, but not limited to, current laws and regulations, defensive driving, accident prevention, emergency procedures, and passenger loading and unloading. Failure to successfully complete the required training during any 12-month period of certificate validity is cause for the Department of Motor Vehicles to cancel the busdriver certificate. All training required by Section 40089 may be accepted in lieu of the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

40086.

Applicants seeking to renew a certificate to drive a farm labor vehicle shall have successfully completed two hours of classroom instruction for each 12 months of certificate validity covering, but not limited to, current laws and regulations, accident prevention, and defensive driving. Failure to successfully complete the required training during any 12-month period of certificate validity is cause for the Department of Motor Vehicles to cancel the farm labor vehicle driver license or certificate. All training required in Section 40089 may be accepted in lieu of the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

40087.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), driver training required by this chapter shall be properly documented on the State Department of Education Training Certificate T-01, and signed by a state-certified school pupil activity bus (SPAB), transit bus, schoolbus, or farm labor vehicle driver instructor of the appropriate class, and by the driver or applicant. The signatures certify that the instruction was given to, and received by, the applicant or driver, and that the applicant or driver displayed a level of competency necessary to drive the vehicle in a safe and competent manner. The applicant or driver shall present the completed State Department of Education Training Certificate T-01 to the examining state agency when applying for an endorsement or certificate, or, for renewal of an endorsement or certificate.

(b) Driver training provided by an instructor certified pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 40081 shall be documented on a form developed by the Department of Motor Vehicles, with the consultation of the department. The form shall be signed by the instructor and by the applicant or driver. The signatures certify that the instruction was given to, and received by, the applicant or driver, and that the applicant or driver displayed a level of competency necessary to drive the vehicle in a safe and competent manner. The applicant or driver shall present the completed form to the Department of Motor Vehicles when applying for a certificate or for renewal of a certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

40088.

(a) An applicant for a school pupil activity bus (SPAB), transit bus, schoolbus, or farm labor vehicle driver instructor certificate shall successfully complete the appropriate instructor course given or approved by the department.

(b) An applicant for the course shall possess:

(1) A valid driver’s license and endorsement valid for driving the vehicles for which the driver instructor rating is sought.

(2) A certificate or endorsement valid for driving the vehicles for which the driver instructor rating is sought.

(3) Five years of experience as a driver in the appropriate vehicle category, or two years experience of that driving experience and three years equivalent experience driving vehicles that require a class A or B driver’s license.

(4) A high school diploma or General Education Development (GED) equivalent.

(5) A driving record without chargeable accidents within the past three years preceding the date of application for the instructor certificate.
